pt-PT: Acabamento de gaita: Preto; Escovado; Cromado; Dourado; Mate; Polido; Outro
nl: Afwerking harmonica: Zwart; Geborsteld; Chroom; Goud; Mat; Gepolijst; Overig
fi: Huuliharpun pintakäsittely: Musta; Harjattu; Kromi; Kullanvärinen; Matta; Kiillotettu; Muu
ro-RO: Finisaj pentru armonică: Negru; Periat; Crom; Auriu; Mat; Lustruit; Altele
ko: 하모니카 마감: 검정색; 브러시드; 크롬; 금색; 무광; 광택; 기타
zh-TW: 口琴表面處理: 黑色; 刷紋; 鍍鉻; 金色; 霧面; 拋光; 其他
hr-HR: Završna obrada harmonike: Crna; Brušeno; Krom; Zlatna; Mat; Polirano; Ostalo
vi: Hoàn thiện kèn harmonica: Màu đen; Phay xước; Crom; Màu vàng; Mờ; Bóng; Khác
hu: Harmonika felülete: Fekete; Szálcsiszolt; Króm; Arany; Matt; Polírozott; Egyéb
th: ฮาร์โมนิกาจบ: สีดำ; ปัดลายเส้น; โครเมียม; สีทอง; ด้าน; ขัดเงา; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Úprava povrchu harmoniky: Čierna; Brúsená; Chróm; Zlatá; Matná; Leštená; Iné
en: Harmonica finish: Black; Brushed; Chrome; Gold; Matte; Polished; Other
da: Mundharmonikafinish: Sort; Børstet; Krom; Guld; Mat; Poleret; Andet
zh-CN: 口琴表面处理: 黑色; 拉丝; 镀铬; 金色; 哑光; 抛光; 其他
lt-LT: Lūpinės armonikėlės apdaila: Juoda; Šlifuota; Chromas; Auksas; Matinė; Poliruota; Kita
nb: Overflatebehandling for munnspill: Svart; Børstet; Krom; Gull; Matt; Polert; Annet
ja: ハーモニカ仕上げ: 黒; ブラッシュ; クローム; 金色; マット; ポリッシュ; その他
sv: Munspel – ytfinish: Svart; Borstad; Krom; Guld; Matt; Polerad; Övrigt
bg-BG: Покритие на хармониката: Черен; Матиран; Хромиран; Златен; Матов; Полиран; Друго
pl: Wykończenie harmonijki: Czarny; Szczotkowany; Chrom; Złoty; Matowy; Polerowany; Inne
pt-BR: Acabamento da gaita: Preto; Escovado; Cromado; Dourado; Fosco; Polido; Outro
de: Finish der Mundharmonika: Schwarz; Gebürstet; Chrom; Gold; Matt; Poliert; Sonstige
fr: Finition harmonica: Noir; Brossé; Chrome; Or; Mat; Poli; Autre
es: Acabado de la armónica: Negro; Cepillado; Cromo; Oro; Mate; Pulido; Otro
tr: Mızıka yüzey kaplaması: Siyah; Fırçalanmış; Krom; Altın; Mat; Parlak; Diğer
cs: Povrchová úprava harmoniky: Černá; Kartáčovaná; Chromovaná; Zlatá; Matná; Leštěná; Jiné
ru: Отделка гармоники: Черный; Шлифованный; Хром; Золото; Матовый; Полированный; Другое
el: Φινίρισμα φυσαρμόνικας: Μαύρο; Βουρτσισμένο; Χρώμιο; Χρυσό; Ματ; Γυαλισμένο; Άλλο
it: Finitura dell'armonica: Nero; Spazzolato; Cromo; Oro; Opaco; Lucido; Altro
sl-SI: Površinska obdelava ustne harmonike: Črna; Brušeno; Krom; Zlata; Mat; Polirano; Drugo